Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-607
Notice.

Notice of a determination that an individual is incapable of making health care decisions shall be given by the primary health care provider (1) to the individual when there is any indication of the individual's ability to comprehend such notice, (2) to the surrogate, and (3) to the health care facility.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 7.